pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Desportos náuticos e aquáticos > Windfoil: Acessórios de windfoil; Pranchas de windfoil; Asas de windfoil; Conjuntos de windfoil; Peças de windfoil; Velas de windfoil
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Гребля и водные виды спорта > Виндфойлинг: Аксессуары для виндфойлинга; Доски для виндфойлинга; Крылья для виндфойлинга; Комплекты для виндфойлинга; Компоненты для виндфойлинга; Паруса для виндфойлинга
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Csónakázás és vízi sportok > Szélszörfözés: Szélszörfözési kiegészítők; Szélszörfözési deszkák; Szélszörfözési fóliák; Windfoil csomagok; Szélszörfözési alkatrészek; Szélszörfözési vitorlák
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Boten en watersport > Windfoiling: Windfoil accessoires; Windfoil borden; Windfoilfoils; Windfoil-pakketten; Windfoilonderdelen; Windfoil zeilen
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Båt- och vattensporter > Windfoiling: Windfoil-tillbehör; Windfoil-brädor; Windfoil-folier; Vindfoiling-paket; Windfoil-delar; Windfoil-segel
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 보트 놀이/수상 스포츠 > 윈드포일링: 윈드포일 액세서리; 윈드포일 보드; 윈드포일 포일; 윈드포일 패키지; 윈드포일 부품; 윈드포일 돛
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Żegluga i sporty wodne > Windfoiling: Akcesoria do windfoila; Deski do windfoila; Foile do windfoila; Pakiety sprzętu do windfoila; Części do windfoila; Żagle do windfoila
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Плаване с лодка и водни спортове > Уиндфойл: Аксесоари за уингфойл; Дъски за уиндфойл; Фойл за уингфойл; Комплекти за уиндфойл; Части за уиндфойл; Платна за уиндфойл
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Chèo thuyền và thể thao dưới nước > Lướt ván gió: Phụ kiện lướt ván gió; Ván lướt ván gió; Cánh ngầm lướt ván gió; Bộ windfoil trọn gói; Linh kiện lướt ván gió; Cánh buồm lướt ván gió
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Plimbări cu barca și sporturi nautice > Windfoiling: Accesorii pentru windfoil; Plăci pentru windfoiling; Folii pentru windfoiling; Pachete pentru windfoil; Piese pentru windfoiling; Vele pentru windfoiling
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Plovidba i vodeni sportovi > Windfoiling: Dodaci za windfoiling; Daske za windfoiling; Hidrokrila za windfoiling; Paketi za windfoiling; Dijelovi opreme za windfoiling; Jedra za windfoiling
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Veneily ja vesiurheilu > Siipilautailu: Siipilautailuvarusteet; Siipilautailulaudat; Siipilautailufoilit; Windfoil-pakkaukset; Siipilautailuosat; Siipilautailupurjeet
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Boating & Water Sports > Windfoiling: Windfoil Accessories; Windfoil Boards; Windfoil Foils; Windfoil Packages; Windfoil Parts; Windfoil Sails
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Sport acquatici > Windfoil: Accessori per windfoil; Tavole da windfoil; Foil per windfoil; Pacchetti windfoil; Parti del windfoil; Vele per windfoil
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 划船/水上运动 > 风帆冲浪: 风帆冲浪配件; 风帆冲浪板; 风帆水翼; 风帆水翼套装; 风帆冲浪部件; 风帆
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Deportes acuáticos y navegación deportiva > Windfoiling: Accesorios para windfoil; Tablas de windfoil; Aletas de windfoil; Paquetes para windfoil; Piezas de windfoil; Velas de windfoil
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Plaukiojimas valtimis ir vandens sportas > Orlenčių sportas: Orlenčių priedai; Orlenčių sporto lentos; Orlenčių sporto vandensparniai; Windfoil paketai; Orlenčių sporto įrangos dalys; Orlenčių sporto burės
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Canoagem e esportes aquáticos > Windfoiling: Acessórios de windfoil; Pranchas de windfoil; Foil de windfoil; Pacotes de windfoil; Peças de windfoil; Velas de pranchas para windfoil
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Plovba in vodni športi > Jadranje s foilom: Dodatki za jadranje s foilom; Deske za jadranje s foilom; Foili za jadranje s foilom; Kompleti za hidrokrilno windsurfanje; Deli za jadranje s foilom; Jadra za jadranje s foilom
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > ウォータースポーツ・アクティビティ > ウィンドフォイル: ウィンドフォイルアクセサリー; ウィンドフォイルボード; ウィンドフォイルフォイル; ウィンドフォイルパッケージ; ウィングフォイルパーツ; ウィングフォイルセーリング
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Kayıkçılık ve Su Sporları > Windfoil: Windfoil Aksesuarları; Windfoil Tahtaları; Windfoil Folyoları; Windfoil paketleri; Windfoil Parçaları; Windfoil Yelkenleri
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Boot- & Wassersport > Windfoiling: Zubehör für Windfoiling; Windfoilboards; Foilen für Windfoiling; Windfoil-Komplettsets; Ersatzteile für Windfoiling; Segel für Windfoiling
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 水上運動 > 水翼風翼: 水翼風翼配件; 水翼風翼板; 水翼風翼箔片; 風帆水翼套裝; 水翼風翼零件; 水翼風翼風帆
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Båt og vannsport > Windfoiling: Windfoil-utstyr; Windfoil-brett; Foiler til windfoiling; Vindfoil-pakker; Windfoil-deler; Windfoil-seil
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > กีฬาทางเรือและทางน้ำ > วินด์ฟอยล์: อุปกรณ์วินด์ฟอยล์; บอร์ดวินด์ฟอยล์; ฟอยล์วินด์ฟอยล์; แพ็คเกจวินด์ฟอยล์; ชิ้นส่วนวินด์ฟอยล์; ใบเรือวินด์ฟอยล์
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Sejling og vandsport > Windfoiling: Tilbehør til windfoil; Bræt til windfoil; Windfoil-folie; Pakker til windfoil; Dele til windfoil; Sejl til windfoil
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Plaisance et sports nautiques > Windfoil: Accessoires pour windfoil; Planches de windfoil; Foils de windfoil; Packs de windfoil; Pièces de windfoil; Voiles de windfoil
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Lodě a vodní sporty > Windfoiling: Windfoil – doplňky; Windfoil – prkna; Windfoil – foily; Komplety pro windfoiling; Windfoil – součásti; Windfoil – plachty
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Člnkovanie a vodné športy > Windfoiling: Príslušenstvo k windfoilingu; Dosky k windfoilingu; Windfoilingové fólie; Balíčky pre windfoil; Diely windfoilingu; Windfoilingové plachty
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Ναυσιπλοΐα & θαλάσσια σπορ > Windfoiling: Αξεσουάρ Windfoil; Σανίδες Windfoil; Συστήματα Windfoil Foils; Πακέτα windfoil; Ανταλλακτικά Windfoil; Ιστία Windfoil